California statutes. Financial Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 483.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4837.

In determining whether to approve any application filed under this division or under any regulation or order issued under this division, the commissioner may consider proposals made by the applicant; and, if in the opinion of the commissioner it is probable that the applicant will be able to implement any such proposal, the commissioner may make findings on the basis of the proposal. However, whenever the commissioner approves an application on the basis, in whole or in part, of a proposal made by the applicant, the commissioner shall impose upon the approval
 appropriate conditions requiring that the applicant implement the proposal within the period of time that the commissioner may specify.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 484.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4838.

If the commissioner finds, with respect to any application filed under this division or under any regulation or order issued under this division, that not all the information which was required to be provided in or in connection with the application has been provided or that implementation of any proposal contained in the application would violate any applicable law, the commissioner may deny the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 485.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4839.

Fees shall be paid to, and collected by, the commissioner, as follows:

(a) The fee for filing an application for approval of a sale under this division shall be two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(b) The fee for filing an application for approval of a merger under this division shall be two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(c) (1) The fee for filing an application for approval of a conversion under this division shall be five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(2) The fee for issuing a certificate of authority or license under subdivision (a) of Section 4928 or
 subdivision (a) of Section 4948 shall be two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(d) The fee for issuing a certificate of authority or license under any other provision of this division shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

(e) The fee for issuing a certificate under Section 4862, 4879.17, 4891, 4930, or 4952 shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

(f) In case the commissioner makes an examination in connection with a pending application, as described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6) the applicant shall pay a fee for the examination, as determined by the commissioner. In determining the fee, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost, including, but not limited to, overhead, for all persons performing the examination, plus, if in the opinion of the commissioner it is necessary for any examiner engaged in the examination to travel outside this state, the travel expenses of the examiner.

(1) Examination of the selling depository corporation in connection with a pending application for approval of a sale of a whole business unit (as defined in Section 4840) under Article 2 (commencing with Section 4845) of Chapter 3.

(2) Examination of the partial business unit (as defined in Section 4840) to be sold and any related affairs of the selling depository corporation in connection with a pending application for approval of a sale of a partial business unit (as defined in Section 4840) under Article 2 (commencing with
 Section 4845) of Chapter 3.

(3) Examination of the purchasing depository corporation in connection with a pending application for approval of a sale of a whole business unit (as defined in Section 4880) under Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 4876.01) of Chapter 3 or of a partial business unit (as defined in Section 4880) under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 4878.01) of Chapter 3.

(4) Examination of the surviving depository corporation in connection with a pending application for approval of a merger under Article 4 (commencing with Section 4908.01) of Chapter 4.

(5) Examination of the disappearing depository corporation in connection with a pending application for approval of a merger under Article 1 (commencing with Section 4880) or Article 2 (commencing with Section 4895.01) of Chapter 4.

(6) Examination of the converting depository corporation in connection with a pending application for approval of a conversion under Article 1 (commencing with Section 4920) or Article 2 (commencing with Section 4940) of Chapter 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 20, Sec. 11.   (AB 137)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Sale [4840. - 4879.17.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [4840. - 4843.]

4840.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) “Branch business unit” means all or substantially all of the business of a branch office of a depository corporation.

(b) “Business unit” means a branch business unit, a partial business unit, or a whole business unit.

(c) “Independent trust company” means a trust company that is neither a commercial bank nor a
 title insurance company.

(d) “Fiduciary asset,” when used with respect to a depository corporation that transacts trust business, means any asset that the depository corporation holds in its capacity as fiduciary.

(e) “Partial business unit” means all or substantially all of any of the following:

(1) The business of any office, other than the head office, of a depository corporation.

(2) In the case of a depository corporation that transacts trust business:

(A) The trust business of the depository corporation, unless the depository corporation transacts only trust business.

(B) The trust business of any office of the
 depository corporation.

(C) The business, other than trust business, of the depository corporation.

(D) The business, other than trust business, of any office of the depository corporation.

In addition, “partial business unit” means any deposit, any fiduciary account, or any portion of the business of a depository corporation that includes a deposit or fiduciary account and that is less than substantially all of the business of the depository corporation.

(f) “Partial trust business unit” means:

(1) In the case of a California state depository corporation that is an independent trust company:

(A) All or substantially all of the business of any
 office, other than the head office, of the depository corporation.

(B) Any partial business unit consisting of one or more fiduciary accounts and no deposits.

(2) In the case of a California state depository corporation that is a commercial bank or savings association:

(A) All or substantially all of the trust business of the depository corporation.

(B) All or substantially all of the trust business of any office, other than the head office, of the depository corporation.

(C) Any partial business unit consisting of one or more fiduciary accounts and no deposits.

(g) “Purchaser” means a depository corporation that purchases a
 business unit from another depository corporation pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(h) “Seller” means a depository corporation that sells a business unit to another depository corporation pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(i) “Whole business unit” means all or substantially all of the business of a depository corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 25.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4841.

The provisions of Section 1001 of the Corporations Code shall not apply to any transaction which is subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1411, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4842.

If a trust is transferred under this chapter, the transfer shall be good cause for removal of the trustee under the Trust Law (Division 9 (commencing with Section 15000) of the Probate Code).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 126.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4843.

In case a national banking association or federal savings association that is authorized to transact trust business in this state sells a partial business unit located in this state of the type described in paragraph (1) or subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 4840 to a national banking association or federal savings association pursuant to federal law, the sale shall:

(a) Have the same effect as provided in subdivision (e) of Section 4879.14 in the case of a sale
 of the type defined in Section 4879.01.

(b) Be subject to the provisions of Section 4842.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 404, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Sale of Whole Business Unit to California State Depository Corporation or California State-Licensed Foreign (Other Nation) Bank [4845. - 4862.]

4845.

In this article, unless the context otherwise requires, “sale” means any of the sales described in Section 4846.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 487.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4846.

With the approval of the commissioner:

(a) A bank may sell its whole business unit to a California state bank or a California state-licensed foreign (other nation) bank pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the seller is a national banking association or a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank, federal law, and (3) in case the seller or purchaser is a foreign bank, the law of the foreign bank’s domicile.

(b) An industrial loan company may sell its whole business unit to a California industrial loan company pursuant to (1) this article and (2) in case the seller is a foreign (other state) industrial loan company, the law of the foreign industrial loan company’s domicile.

(c) A depository corporation of any class may sell its whole business unit to a California state depository corporation of another class or a California state-licensed foreign (other nation) bank pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the seller is a federal depository corporation or a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank, federal law, (3) in case the seller is a foreign depository corporation, the law of the foreign depository corporation’s domicile, and (4) in case the purchaser is a California state-licensed foreign (other nation) bank, the law of the foreign bank’s domicile.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 488.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4847.

A seller and purchaser shall make an agreement of sale, providing:

(a) That the seller shall sell to the purchaser, and the purchaser shall purchase from the seller, the seller’s whole business unit.

(b) That the purchaser will assume and be subject to all the debts and liabilities of the seller in the same manner as if the purchaser had itself incurred them.

(c) Other
 provisions as may be appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 132.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4848.

The agreement of sale shall be approved by the seller and purchaser, as follows:

(a) In the case of a California state depository corporation:

(1) If the sale constitutes a reorganization, as defined in Section 181 of the Corporations Code, the agreement of sale shall be approved as required by Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(2) If the sale does not constitute a reorganization, as defined in Section 181 of the Corporations Code, and if the California state depository corporation is the seller, the agreement of sale shall be approved by the board of the seller, and the principal terms of the agreement of sale shall be approved by the outstanding shares of the seller.

(3) If the sale does not constitute a reorganization, as defined in Section 181 of the Corporations Code, and if the California state depository corporation is the purchaser:

(A) If, as of the time when the agreement of sale is made, the deposits, if any, of the business unit are less than 10 percent of the total deposits of the purchaser and the fiduciary assets, if any, of the business unit are less than 10 percent of the total fiduciary assets of the purchaser, the agreement of
 sale shall be approved by the board of the purchaser.

(B) Otherwise, the agreement of sale shall be approved by the board of the purchaser, and the principal terms of the agreement of sale shall be approved by the outstanding shares of the purchaser.

(4) For purposes of paragraph (3):

(A) The amount of deposits shall be determined as of the end of the calendar quarter immediately preceding the making of the agreement of sale.

(B) The value of fiduciary assets shall be the net carrying value, as determined in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles, as of the end of the calendar quarter immediately preceding the making of the agreement of sale.

(b) In the case of a
 depository corporation other than a California state depository corporation, the agreement of sale shall be approved as required by the law of the depository corporation’s domicile.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 133.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4849.

(a) Any amendment to an agreement of sale shall be approved by the seller and purchaser, as follows:

(1) In the case of a California state depository corporation, by the board of the corporation, and, if the principal terms of the agreement of sale were required to be approved by the outstanding shares of the corporation under Section 4848 and if the amendment changes any of the principal terms of the agreement of sale, by the outstanding shares of the corporation.

(2) In the case of a depository corporation other than a California state depository corporation, as required by the law of the depository corporation’s domicile.

(b) If an agreement of sale is amended and if the amendment is approved as required by subdivision (a), the agreement of sale, as thus amended, constitutes the agreement of sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 27.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4850.

In the case of a seller or purchaser which is a California state depository corporation, any approval of the outstanding shares of the corporation required by Section 4848 or 4849 may be given before or after the approval of the board of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 135.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4851.

In obtaining any approval of outstanding shares required for an agreement of sale, in case the purchaser is a California state depository corporation, the purchaser, and, in case the seller is a California state depository corporation or in case the purchaser is a California state depository corporation that is to issue securities in consideration of the sale, the seller, shall each provide to its shareholders information as the commissioner may require. In determining the information to be required, the commissioner shall give due consideration to regulations
 relating to proxy statements issued under Section 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 78n) by (a) the Securities and Exchange Commission, (b) in the case of a depository corporation that is a bank, the federal bank regulatory agencies, and (c) in the case of a depository corporation that is a savings association, the Office of Thrift Supervision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 489.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.

A purchaser or seller that is a California state depository corporation, with the approval of its board and without further approval of the outstanding shares, may, and any other purchaser or seller, with approval as may be required under the law of its domicile, may, abandon the sale at any time before the sale becomes effective, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of other parties, including the seller or purchaser, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 137.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4853.

In case a purchaser is a California state depository corporation, the provisions of Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code do not apply to the shareholders of the purchaser in a sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 138.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4854.

A purchaser shall file the following with the commissioner:

(a) A copy of the agreement of sale.

(b) An officers’ certificate of the purchaser, certifying that the agreement of sale has been approved by the purchaser as required by Sections 4848 and 4849.

(c) An officers’ certificate of the seller, certifying that the agreement of sale has been approved by the seller
 as required by Sections 4848 and 4849.

(d) An application for approval of the sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 490.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4855.

If the commissioner finds all of the following with respect to an application for approval of a sale, the commissioner shall approve the application:

(a) That the sale will not result in a monopoly and will not be in furtherance of any combination or conspiracy to monopolize or to attempt to monopolize the banking, savings association, or industrial loan business in any part of this state.

(b) That the sale will not have the effect
 in any section of this state of substantially lessening competition, tending to create a monopoly, or otherwise being in restraint of trade, or that the anticompetitive effect is clearly outweighed in the public interest by the probable effect of the sale in meeting the convenience and needs of the community to be served.

(c) That the shareholders’ equity of the purchaser will be adequate and that the financial condition of the purchaser will be satisfactory.

(d) That the directors and executive officers of the purchaser will be satisfactory.

(e) That the purchaser will afford reasonable promise of successful operation and that it is reasonable to believe that the purchaser will be operated in a safe and sound manner and in compliance with all applicable laws.

(f) That the sale will be fair, just, and equitable. For purposes of this subdivision, in the case of any term of the sale that has been determined by agreement between the seller and the purchaser in an arm’s length transaction, the commissioner shall find that the term is fair, just, and equitable to the seller and the purchaser.

(g) In the case of a sale where the seller is a California savings association, that the sale will not have a seriously adverse effect on the total availability of financing for housing in the market area of the seller in this state or that any effect of that type is clearly outweighed in the public interest by the probable effect of the sale in meeting the convenience and needs of the community to be served. Nothing in this subdivision authorizes the commissioner to require the purchaser to make financing for housing available.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application for approval of the sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 491.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4857.

After an application for approval of a sale has been approved and all conditions precedent to the sale have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall approve the agreement of sale and endorse the approval on the original or a copy of the agreement of sale, and at that time the sale shall become effective for all purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 493.1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4858.

When a sale becomes effective:

(a) Unless the purchaser provided otherwise in the application for approval of the sale or unless the commissioner provided otherwise in the approval of the application:

(1) The purchaser may establish and maintain a branch office at the head office of the seller and establish and maintain equivalent offices at the branch offices, places of business, extensions of offices, and other facilities, if any,
 of the seller.

(2) If the seller was authorized to transact and was transacting trust business, the purchaser, if it is a California state bank or savings association, may transact trust business.

(b) The commissioner shall issue to the purchaser certificates of authority, licenses, and other authorizations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 494.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4859.

When a sale becomes effective:

(a) The purchaser shall succeed, without other transfer, to all the rights and property of the seller except any rights and property of the seller which are specifically not sold to the purchasing corporation under the agreement of sale. 

(b) The purchaser shall assume and be subject to all the debts and liabilities of the seller in the same manner as if the purchaser had itself incurred them.

(c) All rights of creditors of the seller and all liens upon the property of the seller shall be preserved unimpaired, provided that such liens upon the property of the seller shall be limited to the property affected thereby immediately prior to the time when the sale becomes effective.

(d) Any action or proceeding pending by or against the seller may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the purchaser, or the purchaser may be proceeded against or substituted in place of the seller.

(e) Any reference to the seller in any writing, whether executed or taking effect before or after the sale, shall be deemed a reference to the purchaser, if not inconsistent with the other provisions of the writing.

(f) In case the seller was transacting trust business,
 the purchaser shall succeed, without further transfer, to the rights, obligations, properties, assets, investments, deposits, demands, agreements, and trusts of the seller under all trusts, executorships, administrations, guardianships, agencies, and all other fiduciary or representative capacities to the same extent as if the purchaser had originally assumed the fiduciary or representative capacities, and the purchaser shall be entitled to take and execute the appointment to all executorships, trusteeships, guardianships, and other fiduciary or representative capacities to which the seller is or may be named in wills, whenever probated, or to which the seller is or may be named or appointed by any other instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 142.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4860.

No action on account of any debt or liability assumed by a purchaser in a sale may be commenced against the seller more than one year after the time when the sale becomes effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1411, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4861.

Promptly after a sale becomes effective:

(a) The seller shall:

(1) Surrender to the commissioner for cancellation the certificates of authority or licenses issued to it by the commissioner.

(2) File with the commissioner any report regarding the sale that the commissioner may require.

(b) In case the
 seller is a California state depository corporation, the seller shall wind up and dissolve. However, if the seller is a California state bank, the seller may, in the alternative and with the approval of the commissioner, change into a nonbank corporation by amending its articles and changing its name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 495.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4862.

(a) After a sale becomes effective, the commissioner shall issue, upon application, a certificate under his or her official seal, stating that the seller sold its whole business unit to the purchaser and specifying the time at which the sale became effective.

(b) Any certificate pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be prima facie evidence of the fact of the sale and of the regularity of the proceedings taken for the sale and shall be conclusive evidence of the matters in favor
 of any innocent purchaser or encumbrancer for value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 496.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Sale of Whole Business Unit to Federal Depository Corporation, California Federally Licensed Foreign (Other Nation) Bank, or Insured Foreign (Other State) State Depository Corporation [4870. - 4875.]

4870.

In this article, unless the context otherwise requires, “sale” means any of the sales described in Section 4871.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 146.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4871.

(a) A California state bank may sell its whole business unit to a national banking association, a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank, or an insured foreign (other state) state bank pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the purchaser is a national banking association or a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank, federal law, and (3) in case the purchaser is a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank or an insured foreign (other state) state bank, the law of the foreign bank’s
 domicile.

(b) A California industrial loan company may sell its whole business unit to an insured foreign (other state) industrial loan company pursuant to (1) this article and (2) the law of the foreign industrial loan company’s domicile.

(c) A California state depository corporation of any class may sell its whole business unit to a federal depository corporation of another class, a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank, or an insured foreign (other state) state depository corporation of another class pursuant to (1) this article, (2) in case the purchaser is a federal depository corporation or a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank, federal law, and (3) in case the purchaser is a California federally licensed foreign (other nation) bank or an insured foreign (other state) state depository corporation, the law of the domicile of the
 foreign bank or foreign depository corporation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 148.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4871.5.

(a) No provision of Division 1.1 (commencing with Section 1000), except the provisions of Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 1670) of Division 1.1, prohibits or restricts a sale in a case where the seller is a California state bank or a California industrial loan company.

(b) No provision of Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) prohibits or restricts a sale in a case where the seller is a California state savings and loan association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 58.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4872.

A sale is subject to the provisions of Sections 4847 to 4850, inclusive, and 4852 as if the sale were a sale of the type defined in Section 4845.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 31.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4873.

A sale shall have the same effect as provided in Sections 4859 and 4860 in the case of a sale of the type defined in Section 4845.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 151.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4874.

Promptly after a sale becomes effective:

(a) The seller shall:

(1) Surrender to the commissioner for cancellation the certificates of authority or licenses issued to it by the commissioner.

(2) File with the commissioner any report of the sale that the commissioner may require.

(b) The seller shall wind
 up and dissolve. However, if the seller is a California state bank, the seller may, in the alternative and with the approval of the commissioner, change into a nonbank corporation by amending its articles and changing its name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 497.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4875.

(a) After a sale becomes effective, the seller or purchaser may issue an officer’s certificate stating that the seller sold its whole business unit to the purchaser and specifying the time at which the sale became effective.

(b) Any certificate issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be prima facie evidence of the fact of the sale and of the regularity of the proceedings taken for the sale and shall be conclusive evidence of the matters in favor of any innocent purchaser or
 encumbrancer for value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 153.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Sale of Whole Business Unit of California State Independent Trust Company to Uninsured Foreign (Other State) State Depository Corporation [4876.01. - 4876.09.]

4876.01.

In this article, unless the context otherwise requires, “sale” means any sale described in Section 4876.02.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 32.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4876.02.

With the approval of the commissioner, a California state independent trust company may sell its whole business unit to an uninsured foreign (other state) state depository corporation pursuant to this article and the law of the purchaser’s domicile.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 497.2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4876.03.

A sale is subject to the provisions of Sections 4847 to 4852 as if the sale were a sale of the type defined in Section 4845.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 32.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4876.04.

A seller shall file the following with the commissioner:

(a) A copy of the agreement of sale.

(b) An officers’ certificate of the purchaser, certifying that the agreement of sale has been approved by the purchaser as required by Sections 4848 and 4849.

(c) An officers’ certificate of the seller, certifying that the agreement of sale has been approved by the seller
 as required by Sections 4848 and 4849.

(d) An application for approval of the sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 497.3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4876.05.

If the commissioner finds all of the following with respect to an application for approval of a sale, the commissioner shall approve the application:

(a) That the shareholders’ equity of the purchaser will be adequate and that the financial condition of the purchaser will be satisfactory.

(b) That the directors and executive officers of the purchaser will be satisfactory.

(c) That the purchaser will afford reasonable promise of successful operation and that it is reasonable to believe that the purchaser will operate in a safe and sound manner and in compliance with all applicable laws.

(d) That the sale will be fair, just, and equitable. For purposes of this subdivision, in the case of any term of the sale that has been determined by agreement between the seller and the purchaser in an arm’s-length transaction, the commissioner shall find that the term is fair, just, and equitable to the seller and the purchaser.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application for approval of the sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 497.4.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4876.06.

After an application for approval of a sale has been approved and all conditions precedent to the sale have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall approve the agreement of sale and endorse the approval on the original or a copy of the agreement of sale. The sale shall become effective for all purposes at that time except that, if the law of the purchaser’s domicile provides for the sale to become effective at a later time, it shall become effective at the later time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 497.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4876.07.

A sale shall have the same effect as provided in Sections 4859 and 4860 in the case of a sale of the type defined in Section 4845.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 32.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4876.08.

Promptly after a sale becomes effective:

(a) The seller shall:

(1) Surrender to the commissioner for cancellation the certificates of authority issued to it by the commissioner.

(2) File with the commissioner any report of the sale that the commissioner may require.

(b) The seller shall wind up and
 dissolve. However, the seller may, in the alternative and with the approval of the commissioner, change into a nonbank corporation by amending its articles and changing its name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 497.6.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4876.09.

(a) After a sale becomes effective, the seller or purchaser may issue an officers’ certificate stating that the seller sold its whole business unit to the purchaser and specifying the time at which the sale became effective.

(b) Any certificate issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be prima facie evidence of the fact of the sale and of the regularity of the proceedings taken for the sale and shall be conclusive evidence of the matters in favor of any innocent purchaser or
 encumbrancer for value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 32.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Certain Sales of Partial Business Units [4877.01. - 4877.07.]

4877.01.

In this article, unless the context otherwise requires, “sale” means any of the sales described in Section 4877.02.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 498.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4877.02.

A California state bank or a California industrial loan company may sell a California branch business unit to an insured foreign (other state) bank or an insured foreign (other state) industrial loan company pursuant to (1) this article and (2) the law of the domicile of the insured foreign (other state) bank or the insured foreign (other state) industrial loan company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 154.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4877.03.

No provision of Division 1.1 (commencing with Section 1000), except the provisions of Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 1670) of Division 1.1, prohibits or restricts a sale in a case where the seller is a California state bank or a California industrial loan company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 59.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4877.04.

A sale is subject to the provisions of Sections 4879.03 to 4879.06, inclusive, and Section 4879.08 as if the sale were a sale of the type defined in Section 4879.01.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 34.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4877.05.

A sale shall have the same effect as provided in Sections 4879.14 and 4879.15 in the case of a sale of the type defined in Section 4879.01.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 154.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4877.06.

Promptly after a sale becomes effective, the seller shall:

(a) Surrender to the commissioner for cancellation the certificate of authority or license issued to it by the commissioner that relates to the California branch business unit sold.

(b) File with the commissioner any report of the sale that the commissioner may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 499.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4877.07.

(a) After a sale becomes effective, the seller or purchaser may issue an officer’s certificate stating that the seller sold a California branch business unit to the purchaser, describing the business unit, and specifying the time at which the sale became effective.

(b) Any certificate issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be prima facie evidence of the fact of the sale and of the regularity of the proceedings taken for the sale and shall be conclusive evidence of the
 matters in favor of any innocent purchaser or encumbrancer for value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 480, Sec. 154.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Sale of Partial Trust Business Unit by California State Bank or Savings Association to Uninsured Foreign (Other State) State Depository Corporation [4878.01. - 4878.08.]

4878.01.

In this article, unless the context otherwise requires, “sale” means any sale described in Section 4878.02.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 499.2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4878.02.

With the approval of the commissioner, a California state bank or savings association may sell a partial trust business unit to an uninsured foreign (other state) state depository corporation pursuant to (a) this article and (b) the law of the purchaser’s domicile.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 499.3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4878.03.

A sale is subject to the provisions of Sections 4879.03 to 4879.09, inclusive, as if the sale were a sale of the type defined in Section 4879.01.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 35.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4878.04.

If the commissioner finds all of the following with respect to an application for approval of a sale, the commissioner shall approve the application:

(a) That the shareholders’ equity of the purchaser will be adequate and that the financial condition of the purchaser will be satisfactory.

(b) That the directors and executive officers of the purchaser will be satisfactory.

(c) That the purchaser will afford reasonable promise of successful operation and that it is reasonable to believe that the purchaser will operate in a safe and sound manner and in compliance with all applicable laws.
